Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1830.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3604, as


last amended by Section 157, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (68 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 3604), is amended to read as follows:


Section 3604. A. Except as otherwise provided in subsection I


or subsection L of this section, an establishment which meets the


qualifications specified in the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act


may receive quarterly incentive payments for a ten-year period from


the Oklahoma Tax Commission pursuant to the provisions of the


Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act; provided, such an establishment

Req. No. 2517 Page 1


defined or classified in the NAICS North American Industry


Classification System (NAICS) Manual under U.S. Industry No. 711211


(2007 version) may receive quarterly incentive payments for a


thirty-year period. The amount of such payments shall be equal to


the net benefit rate multiplied by the actual gross payroll of new


direct jobs for a calendar quarter as verified by the Oklahoma


Employment Security Commission. For an establishment defined or


classified in the NAICS Manual under U.S. Industry No. 711211 (2007


version) that entered into a contract pursuant to the Oklahoma


Quality Jobs Program Act with the Oklahoma Department of Commerce


before the effective date of this act November 1, 2023:


1. The contract shall be extended from fifteen (15) years to


thirty (30) years; and


2. The extension shall not include additional money awarded but


shall allow for payments to continue for the thirty-year period, or


until the net benefit for the new direct jobs for the original


contract has been fully paid out as calculated based upon the


original application.


B. In order to receive incentive payments, an establishment


shall apply to the Oklahoma Department of Commerce. The application


shall be on a form prescribed by the Department and shall contain


such information as may be required by the Department to determine


if the applicant is qualified. An establishment may apply for an


effective date for a project, which shall not be more than twenty-

Req. No. 2517 Page 2


four (24) months from the date the application is submitted to the


Department.


C. Except as otherwise provided by subsection D or E of this


section, in order to qualify to receive such payments, the


establishment applying shall be required to:


1. Be engaged in a basic industry;


2. Have an annual gross payroll for new direct jobs projected


by the Department to equal or exceed Two Million Five Hundred


Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) within three (3) years of the first


complete calendar quarter following the start date; and


3. Have a number of full-time-equivalent employees subject to


the tax imposed by Section 2355 of this title and working an annual


average of thirty (30) or more hours per week in new direct jobs


located in this state equal to or in excess of eighty percent (80%)


of the total number of new direct jobs; and


4. Provide no employment to an individual that meets the


definition of an H-1B nonimmigrant, as provided in 8 U.S.C., Section


1182(n)(4)(C).


D. In order to qualify to receive incentive payments as


authorized by the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act, an


establishment engaged in an activity described under:


1. Industry Group Nos. 3111 through 3119 of the NAICS Manual


shall be required to:



Req. No. 2517 Page 3


a. have an annual gross payroll for new direct jobs


projected by the Department to equal or exceed One


Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00)


within three (3) years of the first complete calendar


quarter following the start date and make, or which


will make within one (1) year, at least seventy-five


percent (75%) of its total sales, as determined by the


Incentive Approval Committee pursuant to the


provisions of subsection B of Section 3603 of this


title, to out-of-state customers or buyers, to in-


state customers or buyers if the product or service is


resold by the purchaser to an out-of-state customer or


buyer for ultimate use, or to the federal government,


unless the annual gross payroll equals or exceeds Two


Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00)


in which case the requirements for purchase of output


provided by this subparagraph shall not apply, and


b. have a number of full-time-equivalent employees


working an average of thirty (30) or more hours per


week in new direct jobs equal to or in excess of


eighty percent (80%) of the total number of new direct


jobs; and


2. Division (4) of subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of subsection


A of Section 3603 of this title, shall be required to:

Req. No. 2517 Page 4


a. have an annual gross payroll for new direct jobs


projected by the Department to equal or exceed One


Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00)


within three (3) years of the first complete calendar


quarter following the start date, and


b. have a number of full-time-equivalent employees


working an average of thirty (30) or more hours per


week in new direct jobs equal to or in excess of


eighty percent (80%) of the total number of new direct


jobs.


E. 1. An establishment which locates its principal business


activity within a site consisting of at least ten (10) acres which:


a. is a federal Superfund removal site,


b. is listed on the National Priorities List established


under Section 9605 of Title 42 of the United States


Code,


c. has been formally deferred to the state in lieu of


listing on the National Priorities List, or


d. has been determined by the Department of Environmental


Quality to be contaminated by any substance regulated


by a federal or state statute governing environmental


conditions for real property pursuant to an order of


the Department of Environmental Quality,



Req. No. 2517 Page 5


shall qualify for incentive payments irrespective of its actual


gross payroll or the number of full-time-equivalent employees


engaged in new direct jobs.


2. In order to qualify for the incentive payments pursuant to


this subsection, the establishment shall conduct the activity


resulting in at least fifty percent (50%) of its Oklahoma taxable


income or adjusted gross income, as determined under Section 2358 of


this title, whether from the sale of products or services or both


products and services, at the physical location which has been


determined not to comply with the federal or state statutes


described in this subsection with respect to environmental


conditions for real property. The establishment shall be subject to


all other requirements of the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act


other than the exemptions provided by this subsection.


3. In order to qualify for the incentive payments pursuant to


this subsection, the entity shall obtain from the Department of


Environmental Quality a letter of concurrence that:


a. the site designated by the entity does meet one or


more of the requirements listed in paragraph 1 of this


subsection, and


b. the site is being or has been remediated to a level


which is consistent with the intended use of the


property.



Req. No. 2517 Page 6


In making its determination, the Department of Environmental


Quality may rely on existing data and information available to it,


but may also require the applying entity to provide additional data


and information, as necessary.


4. If authorized by the Department of Environmental Quality


pursuant to paragraph 3 of this subsection, the entity may utilize a


remediated portion of the property for its intended purpose prior to


remediation of the remainder of the site, and shall qualify for


incentive payments based on employment associated with the portion


of the site.


F. Except as otherwise provided by subsection G of this


section, for applications submitted on and after June 4, 2003, in


order to qualify to receive incentive payments as authorized by the


Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act, in addition to other


qualifications specified herein, an establishment shall be required


to pay new direct jobs an average annualized wage which equals or


exceeds:


1. One hundred ten percent (110%) of the average county wage as


determined by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce based on the most


recent U.S. United States Department of Commerce data for the county


in which the new direct jobs are located. For purposes of this


paragraph, health care premiums paid by the applicant for


individuals in new direct jobs shall be included in the annualized


wage; or

Req. No. 2517 Page 7


2. One hundred percent (100%) of the average county wage as


that percentage is determined by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce


based upon the most recent U.S. United States Department of Commerce


data for the county in which the new jobs are located. For purposes


of this paragraph, health care premiums paid by the applicant for


individuals in new direct jobs shall not be included in the


annualized wage.


Provided, no average wage requirement shall exceed Twenty-five


Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), in any county. This maximum wage


threshold shall be indexed and modified from time to time based on


the latest Consumer Price Index year-to-date percent change release


as of the date of the annual average county wage data release from


the Bureau of Economic Analysis of the U.S. United States Department


of Commerce.


G. 1. As used in this subsection, “opportunity zone” means one


or more census tracts in which, according to the most recent Federal


Decennial Census, at least thirty percent (30%) of the residents


have annual gross household incomes from all sources below the


poverty guidelines established by the U.S. United States Department


of Health and Human Services. An establishment which is otherwise


qualified to receive incentive payments and which locates its


principal business activity in an opportunity zone shall not be


subject to the requirements of subsection F of this section.


2. As used in this subsection:

Req. No. 2517 Page 8


a. “negative economic event” means:


(1) a man-made disaster or natural disaster as


defined in Section 683.3 of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, resulting in the loss of a


significant number of jobs within a particular


county of this state, or


(2) an economic circumstance in which a significant


number of jobs within a particular county of this


state have been lost due to an establishment


changing its structure, consolidating with


another establishment, closing or moving all or


part of its operations out of this state, and


b. “significant number of jobs” means Local Area


Unemployment Statistics (LAUS) data, as determined by


the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics, for a


county which are equal to or in excess of five percent


(5%) of the total amount of Local Area Unemployment


Statistics (LAUS) data for that county for the


calendar year, or most recent twelve-month period in


which employment is measured, preceding the event.


An establishment which is otherwise qualified to receive


incentive payments and which locates in a county in which a negative


economic event has occurred within the eighteen-month period


preceding the start date shall not be subject to the requirements of

Req. No. 2517 Page 9


subsection F of this section; provided, an establishment shall not


be eligible to receive incentive payments based upon a negative


economic event with respect to jobs that are transferred from one


county of this state to another.


H. The Oklahoma Department of Commerce shall determine if the


applicant is qualified to receive incentive payments.


I. If the applicant is determined to be qualified by the


Department and is not subject to the provisions of subparagraph d of


paragraph 7 of subsection A of Section 3603 of this title, the


Department shall conduct a cost/benefit cost-benefit analysis to


determine the estimated net direct state benefits and the net


benefit rate applicable for a ten-year period beginning with the


first complete calendar quarter following the start date and to


estimate the amount of gross payroll for a ten-year period beginning


with the first complete calendar quarter following the start date or


for a thirty-year period for an establishment defined or classified


in the NAICS Manual under U.S. Industry No. 711211 (2007 version).


In conducting such cost/benefit cost-benefit analysis, the


Department shall consider quantitative factors, such as the


anticipated level of new tax revenues to the state along with the


added cost to the state of providing services, and such other


criteria as deemed appropriate by the Department. In no event shall


incentive payments, cumulatively, exceed the estimated net direct


state benefits, except for applicants subject to the provisions of

Req. No. 2517 Page 10


subparagraph d of paragraph 7 of subsection A of Section 3603 of


this title.


J. Upon approval of such an application, the Department shall


notify the Tax Commission and shall provide it with a copy of the


contract and the results of the cost/benefit cost-benefit analysis.


The Tax Commission may require the qualified establishment to submit


such additional information as may be necessary to administer the


provisions of the Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program Act. The approved


establishment shall file quarterly claims with the Tax Commission


and shall continue to file such quarterly claims during the ten-year


incentive period to show its continued eligibility for incentive


payments, as provided in Section 3606 of this title, or until it is


no longer qualified to receive incentive payments. The


establishment may be audited by the Tax Commission to verify such


eligibility. Once the establishment is approved, an agreement shall


be deemed to exist between the establishment and the State of


Oklahoma, requiring the continued incentive payment to be made as


long as the establishment retains its eligibility as defined in and


established pursuant to this section and Sections 3603 and 3606 of


this title and within the limitations contained in the Oklahoma


Quality Jobs Program Act, which existed at the time of such


approval. An establishment described in this subsection shall be


required to repay all incentive payments received under the Oklahoma


Quality Jobs Program Act if the establishment is determined by the

Req. No. 2517 Page 11


Oklahoma Tax Commission to no longer have business operations in the


state within three (3) years from the beginning of the calendar


quarter for which the first incentive payment claim is filed.


K. A municipality with a population of less than one hundred


thousand (100,000) persons in which an establishment eligible to


receive quarterly incentive payments pursuant to the provisions of


this section is located may file a claim with the Tax Commission for


up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount of such payment. The


amount of such claim shall not exceed amounts paid by the


municipality for direct costs of municipal infrastructure


improvements to provide water and sewer service to the


establishment. Such claim shall not be approved by the Tax


Commission unless the municipality and the establishment have


entered into a written agreement for such claims to be filed by the


municipality prior to submission of the application of the


establishment pursuant to the provisions of this section. If such


claim is approved, the amount of the payment to the establishment


made pursuant to the provisions of Section 3606 of this title shall


be reduced by the amount of the approved claim by the municipality


and the Tax Commission shall issue a warrant to the municipality in


the amount of the approved claim in the same manner as warrants are


issued to qualifying establishments.


L. For any contract executed by an establishment on or after


August 2, 2018, five percent (5%) of the quarterly incentive payment

Req. No. 2517 Page 12


amount shall be transferred by the Oklahoma Tax Commission to the


Oklahoma Quick Action Closing Fund.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2517 QD 1/14/2026 11:05:06 PM







































Req. No. 2517 Page 13